Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-903 Right of retainer.
The amount of a non-contingent indebtedness of a successor to the estate if
due, or its present value if not due, shall be offset against the successor's
interest; but the successor has the benefit of any defense which would be
available to the successor in a direct proceeding for recovery of the debt. [L
1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next